District of Columbia statutes.
9-914

Bonds as legal investments and security for public deposits.

Bonds issued by the Authority under the provisions of this chapter are securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the District, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. These bonds are securities that may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any municipal officer or any agency of the District for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations is now or may subsequently be authorized by law.

History

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-67, § 15, 32 DCR 6093

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1264.